incubator/apertium-hi-en.hi.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
   <alphabet>अआइईउऊएओऐऔऋॠऌॡऍऑपािीुूेोैौृॄॢॣॅॉपापिपीपुपूपेपोपैपौपृपॄपॢपॣपॅपॉ</alphabet>
   <sdefs>
     <sdef n="n"    c="Noun"/>

     <sdef n="m"    c="Masculine"/>
     <sdef n="f"    c="Feminine"/>

     <sdef n="dir"  c="Direct case"/>
     <sdef n="obl"  c="Oblique case"/>
     <sdef n="voc"  c="Vocative case"/>

     <sdef n="sg"   c="Singular"/>
     <sdef n="pl"   c="Plural"/>
   </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
     <pardef n="लड़/का __n">
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>का</l>
           <r>का<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dir"/><s n="sg"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>के</l>
           <r>का<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/><s n="sg"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>के</l>
           <r>का<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>के</l>
           <r>का<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dir"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>कों</l>
           <r>का<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>को</l>
           <r>का<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
     </pardef>

    <pardef n="खर्च__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कु/आँ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>आँ</l>
          <r>आँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r>आँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r>आँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r>आँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लडक/ी__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियाँ</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियों</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भाषाविद/्__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ों</l>
          <r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आशा__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यें</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कवि__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आदम/ी__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियों</l>
          <r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भीड__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लौ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>एँ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="राजा__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आपत्ति__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>याँ</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यों</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="माँ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओं</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यें</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dir"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="लड़का"><i>लड़</i><par n="लड़/का __n"/></e>
    <e lm="भीड"><i>भीड</i><par n="भीड__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ईर्ष्या"><i>ईर्ष्या</i><par n="भीड__n"/></e>
    <e lm="शान्ति"><i>शान्ति</i><par n="भीड__n"/></e>
    <e lm="माँ"><i>माँ</i><par n="माँ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="आशा"><i>आशा</i><par n="आशा__n"/></e>
    <e lm="सरसों"><i>सरसों</i><par n="भीड__n"/></e>
    <e lm="भाषाविद्"><i>भाषाविद</i><par n="भाषाविद/्__n"/></e>
    <e lm="कवि"><i>कवि</i><par n="कवि__n"/></e>
    <e lm="बालू"><i>बालू</i><par n="भीड__n"/></e>
    <e lm="आपत्ति"><i>आपत्ति</i><par n="आपत्ति__n"/></e>
    <e lm="कुआँ"><i>कु</i><par n="कु/आँ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="लौ"><i>लौ</i><par n="लौ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="लडकी"><i>लडक</i><par n="लडक/ी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="राजा"><i>राजा</i><par n="राजा__n"/></e>
    <e lm="आजादी"><i>आजादी</i><par n="भीड__n"/></e>
    <e lm="आदमी"><i>आदम</i><par n="आदम/ी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="खर्च"><i>खर्च</i><par n="खर्च__n"/></e>
